Utah, session 2026, HB62.
Section 1. Section 72-4-105.2 is enacted to read:72-4-105.2. Mountain View Corridor connection.Upon completion of the construction of a proposed highway that connects Mountain View Corridor in Saratoga Springs with Cedar Valley Highway in Eagle Mountain, the department shall recommend to the Legislature an amendment to this part to reflect the new highway.

Section 2:
Section 2. Section 72-4-113 is amended to read:72-4-113. State highways -- SR-71 to SR-80.State highways include:(1)SR-71.  From Route 154 in Riverton easterly to Seventh East Street in Draper; then northerly on Seventh East and Ninth East Streets to Route 186 in Salt Lake City.(2)SR-72.  From Route 24 in Loa northerly to a junction with Route 70 and Route 10 near Fremont Junction.(3)SR-73.  From Route 36 northeast of St. John Station southeasterly on Five Mile Pass to Route 14585 and Route 145 in Saratoga Springs; then easterly again beginning at 850 East in Lehi to Route 89.(4)SR-74.  From Route 89 in American Fork northerly to 200 feet south of the intersection with Canyon Crest Road in Alpine.(5)SR-75.  From Route 15 northwest of Springville easterly to Route 89 near Ironton.(6)SR-76.  From Route 70 easterly to old Fremont Junction on Route 72.(7)SR-77.  From Route 147 north of Benjamin north through Barney Corner; then easterly to Route 89 in Springville.(8)SR-78.  From Route 15 at the Mills Junction Interchange northerly to west of Levan; then east to Route 28 in Levan.(9)SR-79.  From Route 108 easterly on Thirty-first Street in Ogden to the lane separation, then on eastbound lane only to Route 89; then easterly on Thirtieth Street to Route 203; beginning again at Thirtieth Street and Route 89 then westerly on the westbound lane only to merge with eastbound lanes.(10)SR-80.  From the Utah-Nevada state line in Wendover to the Utah-Wyoming state line west of Evanston, Wyoming, on Interstate 80.

Section 3:
Section 3. Section 72-4-114 is amended to read:72-4-114. State highways -- SR-81 to SR-90.State highways include:(1)SR-81.  From Route 30 north to Fielding.(2)SR-82.  From Route 102 north on 300 East Street in Tremonton to Garland; then east approximately 0.8 mile; then north to Route 13.(3)SR-83.  From Route 13 in Corinne westerly to Lampo Junction; then northerly to Route 84 at Howell Interchange.(4)SR-84.  From the Utah-Idaho state line near Snowville to a point on Route 15 at the Tremonton Interchange; then from another point on Route 15 near Roy to Route 80 near Echo, traversing the alignment of interstate Route 84.(5)SR-85. From Route 73 and Route 145 in Saratoga Springs northerly on 800 West to Route 68 in Lehi; then beginning again at Route 68 in Herriman westerly on Porter Rockwell Boulevard; then northerly on Mountain View Corridor Highway to California Avenue in Salt Lake City.(6)SR-86.  From Route 65 at Henefer westerly to Route 84.(7)SR-87.  From Route 40 in Duchesne northerly; then easterly through Altamont; thence southeasterly through Upalco; then east to Route 40 southwest of Roosevelt.(8)SR-88.  From the south end of the Green River Bridge south of Ouray northerly to Route 40 east of Ft. Duchesne.(9)SR-89.  From the Utah-Arizona state line northwest of Page, Arizona, westerly to Kanab; then northerly to a junction with Route 70 near Sevier Junction; then beginning again at the junction with Route 70 south of Salina, northerly through Salina, Gunnison and Mt. Pleasant to a junction with Route 6 at Thistle Junction; beginning again at junction with Route 6 at Moark Junction northerly through Springville, Provo, Orem, and American Fork to Route 15 north of Lehi; then beginning again at a junction with Route 71 in Draper northerly through Sandy, Midvale, Murray, Salt Lake City, and Bountiful to a junction with Route 15 at the 500 west interchange; then beginning again at a junction with Route 15 at Lagoon northerly through Uintah Junction and Ogden to Route 91 near south city limits of Brigham City; then beginning again at a junction with Route 91 in Logan northeasterly to Route 30 in Garden City; then northerly to the Utah-Idaho state line.(10)SR-89A.  From the Utah-Arizona state line south of Kanab northerly to Route 89 in Kanab.(11)SR-90.  From Route 13 in Brigham easterly on 2nd South Street to Route 91.

Section 4:
Section 4. Section 72-4-119 is amended to read:72-4-119. State highways -- SR-131 to SR-140.State highways include:(1)SR-131. From Route 68 in Bluffdale northeasterly85 in Herriman easterly and northerly on Porter Rockwell Boulevard to Route 140 in Bluffdale.(2)SR-132.  From Route 6 in Lynndyl northeasterly through Leamington to Nephi; then southeasterly through Fountain Green and Moroni to Route 89 at Pigeon Hollow Junction.(3)SR-133.  From Kanosh south city limits north through Meadow to Route 15 north of Meadow.(4)SR-134.  From Route 37 at Kanesville northerly to Plain City; then easterly to Route 235 in North Ogden.(5)SR-135. From 2800 West in Lindon easterly via Pleasant Grove Boulevard to Route 129 in Pleasant Grove.(6)SR-136.  From a junction with Route 50 and 125 east of Delta north to Route 6.(7)SR-137.  From Route 89 in Gunnison easterly to Mayfield; then northerly to Route 89.(8)SR-138.  From Route 80 at Stansbury Interchange southeasterly through Grantsville to Route 179 in Tooele County.(9)SR-139.  From Route 6 northerly to Route 157 near Spring Glen.(10)SR-140. From 800 West in Bluffdale easterly on 14600 South to the on and off access ramps on the east side of Route 15.

Section 5:
Section 5. Section 72-4-120 is amended to read:72-4-120. State highways -- SR-141 to SR-145, SR-147 to SR-151.State highways include:(1)SR-141.  From Route 6 in Genola to Route 147 west of Payson.(2)SR-142.  From Route 23 near Newton to Clarkston; then easterly through Trenton to Route 91 in Richmond.(3)SR-143.  From Route 15 west of Parowan easterly through Parowan, then southerly to the Panguitch Lake Road, then easterly and northerly coincident with the Panguitch Lake Road to Route 89 in Panguitch.(4)SR-144.  From Route 92 in American Fork Canyon northerly to Tibble Fork Reservoir.(5)SR-145.  From Route 85 and Route 73 in Saratoga Springs easterly on Pioneer Crossing to Route 89 in American Fork.(6)SR-147.  From Route 141, McBeth Corner; then northerly four miles; then east approximately three miles to Benjamin; then north approximately one mile; then easterly crossing Route 89 one mile; then north to Mapleton; then west to Route 89.(7)SR-148.  From Route 14 north to Cedar Breaks National Monument south boundary.(8)SR-149.  From Route 40 at Jensen northerly to Dinosaur National Monument boundary.(9)SR-150.  From Route 32 in Kamas easterly to Mirror Lake and northerly to the Utah-Wyoming state line.(10)SR-151.  From Route 154 east on 10400 South Street to 1300 West Street; then southeasterly to 10600 South Street; then east on 10600 South Street to Route 15.

Section 6:
Section 6.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.